Massachusetts, session 194th, S2969.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 402 of chapter 203E of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subsection:-
“(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing, a settlor’s power to create a trust may be exercised
by (1) an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of
the power of attorney or (2) a conservator as authorized by Article 5 of chapter 190B.”
SECTION 2. This act shall apply to trusts created on or after July 8, 2012.
of 1